Hawaii statutes.
[§329-50]
Injunctive relief. The
administrator may institute a civil action in any court of competent
jurisdiction for injunctive relief to prevent any violation of this chapter or
any rule adopted to implement this chapter. The court shall have powers to
grant relief in accordance with the Hawaii rules of civil procedure. [L 2008, c
186, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next